Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3998.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0132, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 40. new text end new text begin Subtraction for children. new text end new text begin (a) The amount of income received by a taxpayer who attained the age of 17 or younger during the taxable year is a subtraction. new text end new text begin (b) In the case of a taxpayer who was claimed as a dependent on another return, the subtraction is limited to the sum of: new text end new text begin (1) the taxpayer's earned income; new text end new text begin (2) the amount the taxpayer was required to add to adjusted gross income under section 290.0131; and new text end new text begin (3) the lesser of the amount of unearned income the taxpayer included in adjusted gross income or two times the standard deduction amount for dependents for the taxable year under section 290.0123, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (c) For the purposes of this subdivision: new text end new text begin (1) "income" means any income included in adjusted gross income or any amount required to be added to adjusted gross income under section 290.0131; and new text end new text begin (2) "unearned income" means the portion of adjusted gross income that is not attributable to earned income. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end